Washington statutes.
RCW 26.33.330

Records sealed—Inspection—Fee.

(1) All records of any proceeding under this chapter shall be sealed and shall not be thereafter open to inspection by any person except upon order of the court for good cause shown, or except by using the procedure described in RCW 26.33.343. In determining whether good cause exists, the court shall consider any certified statement on file with the department of health as provided in RCW 26.33.347.

(2) The state registrar of vital statistics may charge a reasonable fee for the review of any of its sealed records.

[ 1996 c 243 s 3; 1990 c 145 s 3; 1984 c 155 s 33.]

NOTES:

Finding—1996 c 243: See note following RCW 26.33.347.